Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.055

Development of arts and humanities.

The commission may develop, sponsor, promote and administer any activity, project, or program within or without this state which is related to the growth and development of the arts and humanities in the state of Washington and may assist any person or public or private agency to this end.

[ 1985 c 317 s 7; 1967 ex.s. c 125 s 1.]